Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1702
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Massage Therapy Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-1703 to 38-1707.01 apply.

Laws 1955, c. 273, § 1, p. 861;

Laws 1987, LB 473, § 42;

R.S.Supp.,1987, § 71-2701;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 132;

Laws 1990, LB 1064, § 14;

Laws 1991, LB 10, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 48, § 2;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 142;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 69;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,278;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 609;

Laws 2019, LB244, § 2.